phonikud.xfst
def V a|e|i|o|u|ə;
def C ʔ|b|g|d|h|v|z|ħ|T|j|k|l|m|n|n|s|ʕ|p|c|q|r|ʃ|t|ʒ;
def Nikkud [V|X|Y|Z|O|'];
def NonVowelNikkud [X|Y|Z|O|'];

def DropGershayim [%" | ״] -> 0;

def NormalizeGeresh ׳ -> ';

def ConsonantMapping א -> ʔ,
    ב -> b,
    ג -> g,
    ד -> d,
    ה -> h,
    ו -> v,
    ז -> z,
    ח -> ħ,
    ט -> T,
    י -> j,
    כ -> k,
    ך -> k,
    ל -> l,
    מ -> m,
    ם -> m,
    נ -> n,
    ן -> n,
    ס -> s,
    ע -> ʕ,
    פ -> p,
    ף -> p,
    צ -> c,
    ץ -> c,
    ק -> q,
    ר -> r,
    ש -> ʃ,
    ת -> t,
    ' -> "^";
# Note: We use the special symbol ^ for geresh here,
# because we have to handle it later after reordering
# and stress becomes '


def VowelMapping ְ  -> ə, # shva
    ֱ -> e, # hataf segol
    ֲ -> a, # hataf patah
     ֳ -> o, # hataf kamatz
     ִ -> i, # hirik
     ֵ -> e, # tsere
     ֶ -> e, # segol
     ַ -> a, # patah
    ָ -> a, # kamatz
    ֹ -> o, # holam
    ֺ -> o, # holam haser,
    ֻ -> u, # kubutz,
    ּ -> X, # dagesh
    ֽ -> e, # meteg (we use it for vocal shva)
    ׁ -> Y, # shin dot
    ׂ -> Z, # sin dot,
    ׇ -> o, # kamatz katan
    ֫ -> ', # ole
    ֯ -> O; # circle

def CoalesceGeresh z -> ʒ,
    g -> dʒ,
    c -> tʃ || _ Nikkud* "^";

def DropGeresh "^" -> 0;

# Special rule for words like עכשיו
# Note: Can't apply too late or else it would mess up לייב lajv
def AjvToAv j -> 0 || a NonVowelNikkud* _ v .#.;

# Need to dedup when both shva + meteg signs appear together
def DedupShvaMeteg e ə -> e;

# Drop em kriah when using circle symbol
def DropCWithCircle C O -> 0;

def Sin ʃ Z -> s;
def Shin ʃ Y -> ʃ;

def ReorderDageshVowel a X -> X a,
    e X -> X e,
    i X -> X i,
    o X -> X o,
    u X -> X u,
    ə X -> X ə;

def ReorderSinShinVowel a Y -> Y a,
    e Y -> Y e,
    i Y -> Y i,
    o Y -> Y o,
    u Y -> Y u,
    ə Y -> Y ə,
    a Z -> Z a,
    e Z -> Z e,
    i Z -> Z i,
    o Z -> Z o,
    u Z -> Z u,
    ə Z -> Z ə;

def ReorderDageshSinShin X Y -> Y X,
    X Z -> Z X;

# Shuruk is encoded with vav+dagesh, transform it to vowel /u/
# Unless it's dagesh hazak, in words like צוואר
def Shuruk v X -> u || [.#. | \V]_;

# Make a new marker L for b/p/k not followed by dagesh
def AddLenitionMarker [..] -> L || BKP _ \X, BKP _ .#.;

def Lenite b -> v,
    k -> x,
    p -> f || _ [\X | .#.];

def DropDagesh X -> 0;

def RemoveEmKriahJ j -> 0 || i (') _ [\V | .#.];
def RemoveEmKriahV v -> 0 || _ (') o;

def PatahGnuva ħ a -> a ħ,
    ʕ a -> a ʕ,
    h a -> a h || _ .#.;

def DropGlottalStopBeforeC ʔ -> 0 || _ C;

def DropFinalGutteral h|ʔ -> 0 || _ .#.;

def DropFinalShva ə -> 0 || _ .#.;

# Next rule could be replaced with smarter shva na/nah logic
def DropShva ə -> 0;

def ReorderStress a ' -> ' a,
    e ' -> ' e,
    i ' -> ' i,
    o ' -> ' o,
    u ' -> ' u;

def DefaultStress [..] -> ' || .#. [\']* _ V [\['|V]]* .#.;

def ModernPronunciation q -> k,
    ħ -> x,
    ʕ -> ʔ,
    T -> t,
    c -> ts;
def ModernDropFinalAyin ʔ -> 0 || _ .#.;

# Special IPA symbols that look like ASCII
def ToIPAEquivalents g -> ɡ,
    ' -> ˈ;

regex DropGershayim
    .o. NormalizeGeresh
    .o. ConsonantMapping
    .o. VowelMapping
    .o. CoalesceGeresh
    .o. DropGeresh
    .o. AjvToAv
    .o. DedupShvaMeteg
    .o. DropCWithCircle
    .o. ReorderDageshVowel
    .o. ReorderSinShinVowel
    .o. ReorderDageshSinShin
    .o. Sin
    .o. Shin
    .o. Shuruk
    .o. Lenite
    .o. RemoveEmKriahJ
    .o. RemoveEmKriahV
    .o. DropDagesh
    .o. PatahGnuva
    .o. DropGlottalStopBeforeC
    .o. DropFinalGutteral
    .o. DropFinalShva
    .o. DropShva
    .o. ReorderStress
    .o. DefaultStress
    .o. ModernPronunciation
    .o. ModernDropFinalAyin
    .o. ToIPAEquivalents;

write att phonikud.att
